Maryland, session 2026, HB0308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
words have the meanings indicated.
(H–1) “COMMERCIAL MAIL RECEIVING AGENCY” MEANS A PERSON THAT IS
AUTHORIZED BY THE U.S. POSTAL SERVICE TO ACCEPT THE DELIVERY OF MAIL ON
BEHALF OF ANOTHER PERSON AS A BUSINESS SERVICE.
(w) “Principal office” means:
(1) The place in this State filed or recorded with the Department as the
principal office of a Maryland corporation, limited liability company, limited liability
partnership, or limited partnership; [or]
(2) SUBJECT TO § 1–407 OF THIS TITLE, AN AN ADDRESS IN THIS
STATE SUPPLIED BY A COMMERCIAL MAIL RECEIVING AGENCY WITH WHICH A
MARYLAND CORPORATION, LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, LIMITED LIABILITY
PARTNERSHIP, OR LIMITED PARTNERSHIP HAS A VALID COMMERCIAL MAIL
RECEIVING AGREEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH U.S. POSTAL SERVICE
REGULATIONS; OR

HOUSE BILL 308 3
(3) If there is no principal office designated UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION OR ADDRESS SUPPLIED UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, the main
office of the Maryland corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or limited partnership in this State for the transaction of business.
1–407.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMERCIAL MAIL RECEIVING AGENCY” MEANS A
PERSON THAT IS AUTHORIZED BY THE U.S. POSTAL SERVICE TO ACCEPT THE
DELIVERY OF MAIL ON BEHALF OF ANOTHER PERSON AS A BUSINESS SERVICE.
(B) IF A PERSON DESIGNATES AN ADDRESS PROVIDED BY A COMMERCIAL
MAIL RECEIVING AGENCY AS A PRINCIPAL OFFICE FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE,
THE PERSON ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE MAIL RECEIVING AGENCY SHALL PROVIDE
THE CONTACT INFORMATION INCLUDED IN USPS FORM 1583 TO THE DEPARTMENT
OR A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY ON REQUEST.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.